 Now we have rats that are 4 months old that are not diabetic and that were previously diabetic.
 O Medico Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the clinical and scientific division of the Canadian Diabetes Association, said the study is still in its early days.
 Like some other specialists, he's sceptical about the cure for diabetes, noting that these findings have no relevance to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Committee for Literature at the Academy of Sweden, announced publicly during a radio program on Sveriges Radio that the committee, incapable of contacting Bob Dylan directly about the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, had abandoned its efforts to contact him.
 Danius said, I've called and sent Emails to your closest collaborator and I've received very friendly replies.
 Previously, Ring's CEO, Jamie Siminoff, commented that the company surfaced when his doorbell could not be heard from his garage.
 He mounted a Wireless Bell, said.
 Siminoff stated that sales increased after his appearance in a 2013 episode of Shark Tank, in which the show's judges refused to fund the startup.
 Siminoff was exhibited on the QVC television shopping channel in late 2017.
 Ring also won a lawsuit against the security company, ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, to date, no drug has been clearly considered as adequate to treat the existing infection.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the area, but formal studies indicated it had less benefits than sought in preventing death.
 ZMapp was used as a control, that is, the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments in the PALM study.
 The U S . gymnastics team supports the letter from the U S . Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute need for the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the U S . O . C . statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sports, can be better served by moving forward with significant changes within our organization, rather than decertification.
 The U S . gymnastics team supports an independent investigation that can clarify how a proportion that was reported so courageously by survivor Larry Nassar could happen without anyone noticing, and defends any change that is necessary and appropriate.
 The U S . gymnastics team and the U S . O . C . have the same goal to make gymnastics and any other sport as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a respectful, healthy and positive environment.
 Through the years 60, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy and his advisor and, later, for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, as Henry Kissinger's successor.
 As a member of the NSA, he helped Carter in the conduct of world diplomatic affairs, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were contemplated with nominations for, respectively, Best Actor and Best Actress.
 The other nominations include Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Original Score, Production Design, Sound Editing, Sound Mixing and Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, received nominations for best original song. The studio Lionsgate received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, in a statement transmitted by the press Secretary, announced that American troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump had a phone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the guard of Islamic State members that, as the statement affirms, European nations refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already well accepted, but also offers details that are not found so frequently in fossils, like colors and the three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists affirm that the upper plumage of this animal was chestnut and the lower was clear or carotene.
 The discovery also gives clues about the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The dinosaur's rake, known as a Hast, do not have a well-developed Hast, but possess other characteristics, such as farpas and bárbulas. In view of this, the researchers concluded that the rake was possibly the result of an evolutionary development posterior to these other characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight, but rather to exhibit or regulate temperature. The researchers suggested that, although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample has the plumage of an adult, not that of a juvenile.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the tail being from a young dinosaur, the sample reveals an adult plumage, not a Penugem.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and wounding more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspected the attacker was a Daesh militant.
 They discovered that the sun operated with the same basic principles that other stars did: the activity of all stars in the system was determined by their luminosity, their rotation, and nothing more.
 Luminosity and rotation are used in conjunction to define the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the number of Rossby, the less active the star is in what refers to the magnetic inversions.
 During his voyage, Iwasaki faced problems on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will allow it to be compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of its predecessors, theoretically with a maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not leave a great impression on Miller, to whom the story was reported.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, "Mike talks a lot during the hearing . I was preparing, so I wasn't paying much attention to what he was saying.
 We will strive to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020, relative to the level of 2005.
 He did not define a value for the cuts, saying that they will be made according to China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to avoid the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later.
 They had been to Nigeria, where some cases of the Ebola virus have occurred.
 The Iraq Study Group showed its report at 12:00 GMT today.
 He warns that there is no guarantee that any action in Iraq at this moment will prevent the war between sects, the increase in violence or the trend towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and for the formation of a consensus in the United States about Middle East policy.
 The report criticized almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive in relation to Iraq and insists on an immediate change of direction.
 The first among the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative be taken before the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to reestablish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and first lady of Argentina, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the Presidency yesterday afternoon in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers away from Buenos Aires.
 Yet eighty percent of our goods were taxed through tariffs in Central American countries. we treat you.
 The debate began with a controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives humorously dubbed the Bush deal for New Orleans.
 The liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the granting of reconstruction contracts to people with influence in Washington.
 More than 4 million people went to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that it was not possible for all to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's Square.
 Several large TVs were installed in various places in Rome so that the people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities of Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar arrangements were made, allowing accompaniment by a large number of people.
 Historians criticized ex-FBI police officers for directing resources to easy cases, especially car theft cases, with the intention of increasing the agency's popularity.
 Soon, officers equipped with riot gear entered the yard and cornered the inmates with tear gas.
 Robin Uthappa made the highest score of the Innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 quatros and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid had a good performance and made a century partnership.
 But after not hitting the target of the captain, India only managed to make 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, finishing the innings.
 The President of the United States, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore in the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long visit to Asia.
 He was received by the vice-prime minister of Singapore, Wong Kan Seng, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the prime minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of defeats in the interim election, Bush spoke publicly about commercial expansion in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review, before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton solicited changes to the Conservative's environmental bill during a meeting with the Prime Minister, asking for a complete and thorough rewrite of the Conservative's environmental bill.
 Since when the Federal Government intervened to take over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some Federal MPs have not liked this act and have called it a prelude to the Federal election that will be called in November.
 But former Prime Minister John Howard said the act was only to protect the hospital's facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government by giving it 45 million Australian dollars more.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings indicated the surfacing of a tsunami. There was some evident tsunami activity recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the island temporarily lost power, which prevented local authorities from receiving the tsunami warning sent by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii located on the coast and in the vicinity were closed throughout Wednesday despite warnings having been suspended.
 The President of the United States, George W . Bush, received the announcement well.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise a "a major step in the direction of achieving verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical storm Jerry, formed in the Atlantic ocean today.
 The National Hurricane Center says at this time, Jerry is not a threat to land.
 The Corps of Engineers estimated that 15 cm of rain could break the previously damaged dikes.
 The Ala Nove, which saw floods of 6 meters during Hurricane Katrina, is currently at the height of the waist, since the nearest dike was overflowed.
 The water is spilling over the dike in a section of 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, administrator of the Commons, expressed his disappointment with the exclusions when he spoke to Wikinews last month.
 Wales basically lied from the beginning . First, acting as if it were for a legal reason. Second, faking that he was years listening, until his exclusion from articles.
 The irritation of the community led to the current efforts to create a policy regarding sexual content for the site that hosts millions of open-license media files.
 The work done was, in its major part, theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the Milky Way.
 Just as the moon exerts a pull on the earth, causing the tides, the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matters in the same way that normal matter affects normal matter.
 This theory states that most of the dark matter around a Galaxy is located in a sort of halo around a Galaxy and is composed of several tiny particles.
 Television reports divulge the whitish smoke coming out of the plant.
 Authorities are warning residents of the vicinity of the plant to stay inside, to turn off air-conditioning and not to drink water from the tap.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive calcium and iodine were identified at the plant.
 Authorities believe that this indicates that the containers may have been breached and are leaking uranium fuel.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered extensively drug resistant tuberculosis in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 He warned that the new variant was "very worrying and alarming because of the high mortality rate", in an interview.
 According to Dr . Moll, some patients may have contracted the virus in the hospital and at least two were health care professionals.
 In the period of one year, a person infected can infect between 10 and 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of XDR-TB in the complete group of people with tuberculosis still appears to be low, 6 out of 330 million individuals infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds and traveling at approximately 17,500 miles per hour, collided at 491 miles of altitude.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was intense.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the accident and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States, from the Department of Defense, is tracking the debris.
 The result of the analysis of the graph will be made available on the public site.
 A doctor who worked at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with homicide after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, authorities in Ohio said.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road wearing a T-shirt and underwear in a state apparently under medicated strong.
 She indicated her Oldsmobile Intrigue car 150 yards away to the police.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blankets stained with blood.
 The police said the body appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were notified at the end of July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak led the Indian government to take certain measures like, the installation of pig collectors in areas gravely affected, distribution of thousands of mosquito nets and spraying of pesticides.
 Millions of vaccine against encephalitis were also promised by the government, which will help prepare health agencies for the next year.
 The plans for vaccines that would be given to the historically most affected areas this year had a delay because of the lack of funds and the low priority given to other diseases.
 In the year of 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where he began working for the Swedish Postal Service after three years, and became their principal recorder.
 He produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and another 28 countries.
 His work is of such quality and detail that he is one of the few famous among philatelists, some specializing in collecting only his work.
 His 1,000th stamp was the magnificent "The Great Feats of the Swedish Kings", by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, in 2000, which is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He was also involved in the recording of cédulas for many countries, and recent examples of his work included the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new 5 and 100 Canadian dollars.
 After the accident, Gibson was moved to a hospital but died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident more or less at 12h GMT of the same day.
 There were children waiting to cross the street and all were screaming and crying, said a witness who was working in a garage near the site of the accident.
 All of them ran back to the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to conclude a fund to help countries affected by global warming to deal with the impacts.
 Money could go to houses that are flood-proof, to better water management, as well as to diversification of crops.
 Fluke wrote that the investments of some to prevent women from talking about their health had no success.
 She came to this conclusion due to the infinity of positive comments and incentives sent to her by individuals of the female and male sex, asking that contraceptive medication be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting ceased, after the wounded were transported to the hospital, about 40 of the other interns remaining in the yard refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to reticulate the situation, but the exigences of the prisoners were not clear.
 Between 22h and 23h (MDT), the inmates caused a fire in the prison.
 Soon, police prepared with antimotor equipment entered the yard and encircled the inmates with tear gas.
 The rescue teams managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal floods that spread sediments throughout the river stopped.
 That sediment was essential to create sand banks and beaches, which served as habitat for wildlife.
 Consequently, two species of fish went extinct, and two others are now at risk, such as the Gila cypha.
 Despite the fact that the water level only rises a few meters after the flood, the authorities expect that it will be sufficient to rescue the banks of sand eroded in the direction of the current.
 No tsunami alert was issued and according to the geophysics agency in Jakarta there will be no need, since the tremor did not reach the magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite there being no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and abandon their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey had choked up in her farewell, she made it clear to fans that she would return.
 This will not be a goodbye. It's the end of a chapter and the beginning of a new one.
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a large margin.
 The party in power, the Organisation of the People of the Southwest African (OPSA), also obtained a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan troops headed to the area to protect the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to help.
 The accident occurred at great altitude in the mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are being hampered by the bad weather and hostile terrain.
 The institutions of medical charity Mangola, Medecins Sans Frontieres and the World Health Organisation say it is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Medecines Sans Frontiere, said, quote,
 The games began at 10 a.m. with good weather and, despite the rain in the middle of the morning, it was a perfect day for the Rugby Sevens.
 The principal selection of the tournament, South Africa, began with foot, conquering a comfortable victory by 26 to 0 over the 5th placed, Zambia.
 Appearing clearly rusty in the game against her sisters of the South, however, South Africa, nonetheless, consistently improved as the tournament advanced.
 Their disciplined defense, their ability to handle the ball and their excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team to be defeated.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum declare that the tree is infected with a fungus and represents a risk to public health, arguing that it was in imminent danger of falling.
 The court was scheduled to meet on Tuesday, but was suspended after an emergency judicial decision.
 All of the caverns, which were named the Seven Sisters, are at least 100 to 250 meters in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the night-to-day temperature variations indicate that they are probably caves.
 They are colder than the surface around them during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as stable as the great caverns of the planet earth, which tend to preserve a well-constant temperature, but it is consistent with the fact that they are deep holes in the ground, said Glen Cushing, of the Astrogeology team at the U.S. Geological Survey and the University of Northern Arizona, in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: Voters seal themselves in a booth and deposit a pre-printed sheet indicating the candidate of their choice in an envelope.
 After the officials verify the identity of the voter, the voter inserts the envelope into the urn and signs the list of voting.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a very rigorous manner.
 Since 1988, voting urns must be transparent so that voters and observers can witness that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelopes are added, except those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to observe all parts of the process, during the night, votes are counted by volunteers under careful supervision, following specific procedures.
 O ASUS Eee PC, recently launched worldwide with improved features and aiming at reducing costs, became a much-discussed topic at the 2007 IT Month in Taipei.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will be radically varied and transformed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 by the Yuan Executive of the Republic of China.
 The site of the station describes the show as a, quote,
 In its early days, the program was exclusively presented on the long-running TogiNet Radio, a site focused on radio talk.
 In the late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 The previous program featured amateur dubbers who lived east of Texas.
 They say that the looting continued throughout the night, while the police were not seen present in the streets of Bishkek.
 The city of Bishkek was described as sinking into a state of anarchy, according to one observer, as mobs of people wandered the streets and looted shops of consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the protesters of the South for the illegality.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a Tri Nations Rugby match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustemburgo, South Africa.
 The final score was a one point win, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it ended a sequence of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last game of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final part of the series will take place at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 22h08 on Monday.
 No immediate report of damage was received by the United States Geological Survey or the National Center for earthquake information.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of avian flu, H5N1, that has been confirmed as having infected a wild duck found Monday in a pond near Lyon in eastern France,
 France is the seventh European country to suffer from the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for, quote,
 Chambers, who is Agnostic, argues that the process is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is about an artist whose life is dictated by love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, actors smoke based on maconha on the stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join them.
 The ex-Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas Rick Perry and the congresswoman Michele Bachmann finished in fourth, fifth and sixth places, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich enhanced Santorum, but said harsh words against Romney, in whose name negative campaign ads were aired in Iowa against Gingrich.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to look at the results of this night's party convention and determine if there was a path for him in this race, but later said he would remain in the race and participate in the South Carolina preliminaries on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 Second information, he was in the house of 20 years, in a statement, Bieber said that, although I was not present nor directly involved in this tragic incident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family.
 According to the entertainment news site TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take photos of the roadside stop before crossing the street and continuing, leading the California highway patrol officer who was conducting the roadside stop to order him to turn around, twice.
 Second, the police say it's unlikely the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be charged criminally.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a considerable number of countries failed to win medals.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen in ninth place in the standing women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, Australian, finished 11th in the men's Super-G. Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished 16th in the men's Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez, of Mexico, finished in fifteenth in the Super-G for men, and Adam Hall, of New Zealand, finished in ninth in the Super-G for men.
 The Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of South Korea finished in twenty fourth place in the men's Super-G sitting event.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are being blamed for spreading the disease, which began near the troop camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not treated adequately, causing bacteria to thrive in the Artibonite River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before troops arrived, Haiti had no problems related to the disease since 1800.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that suggest that the UN peacekeeping battalion in Nepal, without knowing, brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN specialist on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the pacifiers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital declared the patient to be in stable condition.
 The patient was in Nigeria, where some cases of the Ebola virus occurred.
 The hospital has followed the infection control protocol, including separating the patient from others to avoid possible infections in other people.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked in various attractions in several jobs.
 During the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In the year of 1989, he helped create the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing team.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he maintained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Reports later stated that the plane suffered a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Candaar.
 Initial reports said the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after having an emergency landing denied in Ürümqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, which has an aging and poorly maintained fleet for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions prevented buying new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter accident killed three people and injured three more.
 Last month, Iran suffered the worst air disaster in recent years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 It happened again in the same month in Mashhad, another commercial plane entered a runway and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 O Aerosmith canceled the rest of their tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after Steven Tyler, the band's lead singer, injured himself while falling off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray suffered a defeat in the first set in the tiebreaker after both served in the set.
 Del Potro maintained an initial advantage in the second set, but that also demanded a tiebreaker after reaching 6-6.
 Potro received treatment on the shoulder, but managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 20h30 local time (15.00 of Coordinated Universal Time).
 Famous singers throughout the country offered Bhajans, or songs of devotion, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The night began with the presentation of the singer Sanju Sharma, accompanied by Jai Shankar Choudhary. The Chhappan Bhog Bhajan was also presented. The singer Raju Khandelwal was accompanying.
 Lakkha Singh then took the lead to sing the bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (i.e. 56 different dishes like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. which in Hinduism are offered to the deity) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the chhappan bhog bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal was accompanying him.
 In the presentation of Tokyo Game Show, the President of Nintendo, Satoru Iwata, showed the design of the new Console Nintendo Revolution.
 Similar to a television remote control, the Controller uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate their position in three-dimensional space.
 With this, players will be able to control actions and movements in the Video game by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, was leading for most of the race, but his race ended shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a mal-placed front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, because of damage to the suspension in the numerous battles during the race.
 She's a cute little thing and she sings very well, he said, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 She directed officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue which was 500 feet away.
 About 3 minutes after launch, a camera on board showed several pieces of insulation foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, they are not pointed to as having caused damage to the space shuttle.
 The commander of NASA's space shuttle program, N. Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had descended after the moment that really left us preoccupied.
 Five minutes later, a wind starts to blow, about a minute later, the wind is coming at 70km/h... then comes the rain, but so strong and so great that it hits your skin like a needle and hail comes down from the sky, people in panic and screaming and running over each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, people jumping and pushing them.
 NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, in Niigata Prefecture, was functioning normally.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effects from the earthquake and that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear station were shut down.
 It was reported that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water and approximately 100 residences without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, the railway service was suspended in the affected areas and Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the office of the governor general.
 Three bombs exploded near government buildings in a period of two hours.
 Some reports say the official number of dead was eight, and others confirm that up to 30 were injured, but the final numbers are still unknown.
 Both cyanuric acid and melanin were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating the contaminated food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidney function, the researchers at the University said.
 Researchers found crystals formed in the urine of cats when they were added Melanin and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of such crystals corresponds to the compound found in the urine of pets that were hit, when those two compositions are compared using infrared by Fourier transform (FTIR).
 I do not know if you notice this or not, but a large part of the goods from Central America come to this country without paying taxes.
 Still, eighty percent of our products were taxed with tariffs in Central American countries. We treated you.
 That did not seem to make sense to me, certainly not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way you treat us.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The project requires violent video games sold in the state of California to be labeled with a label that reads, quote, unquote,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, gave a statement this morning announcing the charges against Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by Ed Davey MP, who is expected to take over Norman Lamb's MP role as Minister of State for Business.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster magistrates' court on February 16.
 The fatal victims are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery on his face.
 The Uka weapon failed while aiming at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has continuous pain, blindness in one eye, a section missing from his skull, and a titanium-reconstructed face.
 Schneider testified via Videoconference from a U S . Air Force base in his hometown.
 Besides the event on Wednesday, Carpanedo competed in two individual races at the Championships.
 His first was the Slalom, where he received a Did Not Finish in his first run, 36 out of 116 competitors received the same result in the race.
 Her other race, the Slalom Gigante, obtained the tenth position in the group of women sent with a combined result of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 slower than the first placed Australian Claudia Loesch and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth placed Gyöngyi Dani of Hungary.
 Four skiers in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to qualify for the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh recovered the laptop and cell phone stolen.
 The vice-inspector general, D K Arya, said, we have arrested five people who raped the Swiss and recovered her cell phone and laptop.
 The accused were named as Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The accused appeared in court with his face covered, declared the superintendent of police Chandra Shekhar Solanki.
 Despite three people being inside the house when it was hit by the car, none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious injuries to the head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services released the driver of the red Audi TT.
 Initially, he was hospitalized at the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 Later, he was transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has been in the court of Edinburgh's sheriff since then, accused of the murder of her son.
 She is under custody while awaiting indictment and trial, but any evidence of eyewitness could be compromised because her image was widely disseminated.
 This is a common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scotland's justice system acts differently, and the courts consider publication of photos as something potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, observes that, quote,
 The Crown Office, which is in charge of the process, has indicated to journalists that no more comments will be made, at least until the indictment.
 The document, according to the leak, will refer to the dispute of borders, which Palestine wants based on the borders before the Six-Day War in 1967.
 Other issues covered include the future state of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the question of the West Bank.
 Israel demands a continuous military presence in the valley for ten years after a deal is signed, while the PA agrees to leave that presence for only five years.
 The shooters in the supplemental pest control test were under close supervision of the forest engineers while the test was monitored and its efficacy evaluated.
 In a partnership between the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers were recruited, according to the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, Interim Director of Conservation and Heritage at Parque do NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first hunting operation received comprehensive safety instructions and training.
 Yesterday, Martelly promised a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) of nine members.
 It's the fifth CEP of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a presidential Commission recommended the CEP's resignation as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was the response given by Martelly to the general protests organized against the regime, which had begun in October.
 Occasionally violent protests were sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled since 2011.
 About 60 cases of iPods with superheating problems were reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan (METI) said it was aware of 27 accidents related to the devices.
 Last week, the METI divulged that the apple had informed them of more 34 incidents of overheating, which the company classified as non-serious.
 The Ministry responded by calling the Apple's delay of the report a truly lamentable.
 The earthquake hit Mariana at 07h19min, local time. In GMT, it was Friday, at 21h19min.
 The office of emergency management of the Northern Marianas said there were no reported damage in the country.
 Besides, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino policeman seized a bus full of tourists in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and held them hostage in Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six were confirmed dead so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released earlier, as well as the Filipino photographers.
 Then, the photographers took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot dead.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and entered a career in medicine.
 He trained as an obstetrician and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Although he was working at the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 Your research demonstrated that if a hormone were administered, it would accelerate the fetal lung maturation of the baby.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators recovered two black boxes, flight data recorders, on Wednesday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first business woman. Luna passed away on a night with two moons. Something exceptional, just like her.
 Dustin Goldust Runnels said, quote, Luna was as crazy as me . or maybe even more . I loved her and will miss her . I hope she's in a better place.
 Among the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 Federal Election, the percentage of those opposed to changing Australia to a Republic has grown by 8% since 2008.
 Prime Minister Julia Gillard, during the 2010 campaign for the national election, stated that she believed Australia would become a republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those who participated in the survey share this view, wishing that Queen Elizabeth II be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the extremes of the research, 29% of those surveyed believe Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while 31% believe Australia should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to swim in the 100 and 200 meter freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but due to his complaints, his physical condition was put in doubt.
 He was unable to take the necessary medication to overcome the pain, as these are banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known to date,
 Various people verified the discovery using different types of hardware and software in early February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 It's possible that comets were a source of water to the earth along with the organic matter that can develop proteins and make life possible.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the earth formed, since comets have collided with the earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, began his governorship earlier this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He referred to the rumors as being political and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he will run for President in 2016.
 The NextGen is a system that the FAA says would let airplanes fly in shorter routes, save millions of gallons of fuel each year and reduce carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology in opposition to older, terrestrial radar-based technology to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and offer pilots more precise information.
 There will be no extra transport and surface trains will not stop at Wembley. The car parks and public transport connections will not be available.
 The problem of lack of transportation increased the possibility of the game having to be played behind closed doors, without the presence of the fan.
 On Thursday, the magazine Science published a study where it reports the discovery of a new species of bird in the Galapagos Islands, in Ecuador.
 Researchers from the University of Princeton, in the USA, and the University of Uppsala, in Sweden, reported that the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process took much longer, due to reproduction between an Endemic Darwin, Geospiza fortes, and the immigrant cactus, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked in any type of form. It can even be rolled into small formats.
 It is possible to stretch it to form a fine thread, and it can be twisted and braided, or hammered or wound into sheets.
 It can be very thin and stuck on to other metal, so it was used to decorate paintings in hand-painted books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called a PH chemical. You can make a marker using suck of rocket suck.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color depending on how acid or basic the chemical is.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the chemical tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have had their electrons removed (since hydrogen atoms consist of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two powders and, with clean hands, mold them into the shape of a ball.
 The moisture on the hands reacts with the outer layers, which causes a strange sensation and forms a kind of conch.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a sanitary seat with a discharge in almost all the houses, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Parts of the sewage system were found in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, in Greece.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In the Roman civilization, the toilets were sometimes part of the public baths, frequented by both men and women.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then redirections it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the atmosphere of the earth distorts part of our light and vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 meters high to put a satellite or telescope into space.
 The wheel changed the world in incredible ways. The biggest thing the wheel did for us was give us a much easier and faster transportation.
 Gave us the train, the car, and several other forms of transportation.
 Below them are the medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including feral cats, that eat small animals, much more numerous, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The revelation for their success is the concept of niche, a special function that each cat performs that prevents them from competing with each other.
 Lions are the most social of cats, living in large groups called prides.
 Bands consist of one to three adult males of the same family, along with up to 30 females and young.
 Women costume to be intimately related to each other, being a great family of sisters and daughters.
 Lions act similarly to groups of wolves or dogs, animals surprisingly similar to lions in behaviour, and also very deadly to their prey.
 A well-balanced athlete, the tiger can scale, swim, jump great distances, and pull with five times the strength of a human.
 Tigers are in the same group (Genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, the only four felines that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not like the roar a lion makes, but more like a phrase of words gritted and snarled.
 Jaguatiricas like to eat small animals. They capture monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds if they can. Almost all the animals that Jaguatiricas hunt are much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that jaguatiricas follow and find their prey by smelling where they have been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and also can move furtively. Jaguar cats hunt their prey by mixing themselves with the environment that surrounds them and then attack their prey.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates itself from the main population from which it came (for example, if it transposes a chain of mountains or a river, or goes to an island from which it cannot return with ease), many times it finds itself in an environment different from that in which it had lived before.
 This new environment has different resources and new competitors, so the new population will need to acquire different characteristics from those it already possesses and adapt to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all, they still need the same adaptations they did before.
 Over time, as the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, it will become less and less like the other population.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different that they cannot be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the di oxygen that humans exhale.
 Plants use the sun as their food by means of photosynthesis, and they also offer shade.
 We build our houses using plants and make our clothes using plants. Most of the food we consume is plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosassauro was the Alpha predator of its era, therefore the only thing it feared was other Mosassauros.
 Their long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, along with an extra set in the roof of the mouth, showing that nothing that crossed their path could escape.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sport, may be better served by moving forward with meaningful change within our organization, rather than decertification.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex would not stand a chance.
 Although most of their foods were familiar, the Romans still had their share of strange or uncommon foods, like wild boar, peacock, snail, and a type of rodent called arganaz.
 Another difference was that, while the poor and women ate sitting in chairs, the rich men liked to have banquets together where they lay on their sides while they ate.
 Food in ancient Rome did not include foods originated in America and Asia for Europe, as it did in later centuries.
 For example, they possessed no maize, no tomato, no potato, no cacao, and no ancient Roman ever tasted a Peruvian.
 Babylonians made a primary temple for each of their gods, which were considered the home of their respective deity.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods, and priests sought to meet the needs of these gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary in which only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramids with the shape of towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 Most of the Hebrew family life took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were just open balconies facing the street, and stones were used in the construction of the houses.
 There were no great forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled in the Norse Sagas, it is said that Erik the Red, who was exiled from Iceland for murder, traveled west and found Greenland and gave it that name.
 But regardless of their discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 Although all the countries were Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've ever seen the movie the legend of the lost treasure, you may think a map of the treasure was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 No, this is not true, although there is something written on the reverse of the document, it is not a map of the treasure.
 Written on the Declaration of Independence is the words, Declaration of Independence Original, dated July 4, 1776.
 Though no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that, at the beginning of its existence, the great document of parchment (it measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was rolled up to be stored.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to build simulation models which help us to understand processes in our mind.
 The landings and the following battles on D-Day freed the north of France, but the south was not yet free.
 It was governed by the French Vichy, who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded the South of France, the invasion was called the Dragoon operation.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated the South of France and were turning in the direction of Germany.
 A civilization is a unique culture shared by a large significant group of people who live and work cooperatively, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state, and which also, in some way, defines the size of the society.
 The city-state is the precursor of the nation, culture, the civilization, a durable cultural reach and a just dissemination.
 Cultures smaller frequently fade without leaving adequate historical evidence and are no longer recognized as civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states first formed a weak central government—the Congress being its only component—under the Articles of Confederation.
 Power was lacking to the Congress to exigir tributos, and in reason of not existing executive or national judiciary, it confiava in the authorities state, that generally did not cooperate, to apply all its laws.
 Besides, there was no authority to revoke the fiscal laws and tariffs between the states.
 The articles needed the unanimous consent of all the states before they could be amended and the states gave so little importance to the central government that the representatives of them almost never were present.
 Along with the German national team, the Italian national team is the second most successful in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, hockey and F1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions, with Italians competing in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan possesses about 7,000 Islands, making Japan the 7th largest Island in the world.
 Due to the agglomerate/group of Islands that Japan has, Japan is frequently referred to, in a geographic position, as a "Archipelago"
 Taiwan's foundation dates back to the fifteenth century, when Europeans sailing through the region named the place Ilha Formosa.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company inaugurated a base in the southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation in aboriginal grain production practices and employing Chinese to work in their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the West and North coastal areas of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Shimonoseki Treaty, by which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which governed the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the limits of the complex have been rebuilt to offer tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 In the year of 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was recovered, and this recovery continues to this day.
 As an example, the most common form of still photography on the planet is the 35 mm, which was the size of film that had the most circulation at the end of the analogue film era.
 At the present time, it is still produced, but the most important is that its proportion was inherited by formats of sensor of image of digital camera.
 The format in 35mm is, in fact, confusing, 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 The proportion of screen of this format (dividing by twelve to obtain the smallest ratio between integers) is, therefore, 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS family of formats, for example) are equal or very close to this proportion.
 The much abused and frequently Demoralized law of thirds is a guideline that provides a dynamic while maintaining a relative order in a figure.
 According to him, the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds vertically and horizontally (see example) is the most effective place for the main subject.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was put under scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion united the European states, despite differences in language and customs.
 All were affected by his forceful influence, from the King down to the Plebeian.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth is to be used to alleviate suffering and poverty and that the monetary funds of the church are there specifically for that reason.
 The central leadership of the church has been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and that concentration of power and money has led many to question whether that principle is being followed.
 Soon after the beginning of hostilities, Britain began a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy showed itself effective, with the cutting of vital supplies to military and civilians, although this blockade violated internationally accepted regulations generally accepted in various international agreements in the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent any ship from entering entire areas of the ocean, bringing danger even to neutral ships.
 Germany, once there was a limited response to this tactic, expected a similar attack to its unrestrained submarine warfare.
 During the 1920s, the predominant attitudes of most citizens and nations were those of pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations desired to avoid such a situation again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to accept a job at the Edison company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States without a toast, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, the head of his previous employment, to Thomas Edison.
 China's ancient history had a unique way of demonstrating different eras, each stage of China or each family that was in power was a distinct dynasty.
 Ademais, between each dynasty there was an unstable era of divided provinces. The most known of these periods was the era of the Three Kingdoms, which occurred for 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these periods, a fierce warfare occurred between many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest eras in the history of ancient China, thousands of people died fighting to sit on the throne of the great Palace of Xi'An.
 There are many social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolutism to Republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single ruler.
 Additionally, after the Revolution, vouchers were opened to all candidates of the male sex, allowing the most ambitious and successful to succeed.
 The same was true for the military, since instead of the ranks being based on social class, now they were based on character.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other repressed working-class people of other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in affairs beyond the mundane life. He used to frequent a cave known as Hira' on the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which survived the times, gives a very vivid image of Muhammad's religious inclinations.
 Repousing on the top of one of the mountains to the north of Mecca, the cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It's not easy to find, even if you know it exists, and once inside the cave it's total isolation.
 It is not possible to see anything but the clear blue sky above and the mountains around.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century BC, the great pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor dead Pharaohs.
 The plateau of Giza, or the Necropolis of Giza, in the Valley of the Egyptian Dead, counts with several pyramids (among which the great pyramid is the largest), several small tombs, several temples and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was created in homage to Pharaoh Khufu, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wives and family members.
 The central authority of the church had been in Rome for over a thousand years and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this tenet was being met.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, quite narrow, sole.
 In general, an arc upwards produces a softer sound, while an arc downwards produces a sound that is more assertive and louder.
 You can write your own notes, but don't forget that the printed bow notes exist for a musical reason, so these should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, the terrified King Louis XVI, his wife, Marie Antoinette, their two young sons, Marie Teresa, age eleven, and Louis Charles, age four, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth, were forced to return to Paris, leaving Versailles, by a multitude of women from the markets.
 In a carriage, they traveled back to Paris surrounded by a multitude of people shouting and screaming threats against the King and the Queen.
 The multitude of people obliged the King and the Rainbow to keep the windows of their carriage wide open.
 At one point, a protester waved the head of a dead guard at the queen, terrified.
 The costs of the imperialism of the United States in the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipino population itself.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on bonds with floating rates in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the superlucrative originated from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people constituted the basic gains of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 The era in which such events occurred is commonly called the High Middle Ages, a period of European history between the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries (1000–1300 CE).
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the low Middle Ages and followed by the Tardy Middle Ages, which, by convention, end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a number of ideas in practice, from the offering of technology or the technological imperative to a strict notion that human destiny is determined by a subjacent logic associated with scientific laws and the manifestation of them in technology.
 The majority of interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas: the first is that technological development itself follows a path beyond cultural or political influence, the second is the idea that technology, in turn, has inerent effects on societies that are inerent, rather than socially conditioned.
 For example, someone might say that the automobile necessarily results in the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for just a few cars, so new methods of production are developed to reduce the cost of having a car.
 The posse of cars in mass leads to a greater incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the health system to cure the injured bodies.
 Romanticism had a great element of cultural determinism, extracted from writers like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 Geography, in the context of Romanticism, made the citizens molded and, with the passing of time, costumes and culture linked to that geography, which, by being in harmony with the place of society, became better than the laws eventually obligatory.
 In the same way that Paris is known as the contemporary world's fashion capital, Constantinople was considered the capital of feudal Europe.
 Its fame as the epicenter of luxury began around 400 C.E. and lasted until about 1100 C.E.
 Their status declined during the twelfth century mainly due to the fact that participants of the crusade had returned bringing gifts such as silks and spices, which were worth more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this time that the transfer of the title of capital of fashion from Constantinople to Paris occurred.
 The Gothic language reached its moment of peak in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and also in the 14th century.
 In the beginning, the clothing was very influenced by Byzantine culture in the East region.
 However, due to slow communication channels, styles in the West may lag 25 to 30 years.
 By the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began developing its own style. One of the greatest advances for the time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began using buttons to fasten their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is the agriculture carried out to produce food sufficient to satisfy only the needs of the farmers and their families.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple system, generally organic, that uses seeds guarded native to the ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize production.
 Historically, the majority of farmers have been involved with subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in most developing nations.
 Subcultures bring together individuals of similar mentality who feel neglected by the standards of society and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinct due to age, ethnicity, class, location and or sex of the members.
 The qualities that determine a subculture as distinctive may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture frequently signal their filiation through a distinct and symbolic use of style, which includes fashions, manners, and jargons.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to recur to the few lamentable cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or intentional abuse, have not been socialized by adults while they were growing up.
 These children are called ferozes or selvagens, some of these children were confined by people, usually by their own parents, in some cases, the rejection of this child by parts of the parents because of their severe intellectual or physical disability.
 Children who are revolted may have suffered serious traumas or abuse in childhood before being abandoned or running away from home.
 Some others were created by animals, some say, and some others lived by themselves in the jungle.
 When completely created by animals, the wild child exhibits behaviors (within physical limits) almost entirely similar to those of the particular pet animal, such as its fear or indifference to humans.
 Although project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, the scaffolding method goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a method of learning, but a help for students who are going through a new learning experience, like using a new computer or starting a new project.
 Scaffolds can be virtual or physical, in other words, a teacher can be considered a scaffold, just like that little talking clip in Microsoft office.
 The virtual andaimes are internalized in the software with the objective to question, alert and explain procedures that can be challenging for the student to handle alone.
 Children are placed in foster care for a myriad of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should grow up in an environment that does not nurture, care and educate, but this happens.
 We envision the family system as a zone of safety for these children.
 Our adoption platform has the duty to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, regular education and guaranteed medical care.
 It is supposed that adoptive care satisfies all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines elements of both interpersonal and mass communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, learning and socialization are indicated as important motivations for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 Envolvement and relationships with continuity were also identified as new characteristics of motivation by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied public reactions to web pages.
 The use of Video recording led to important discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, facial movements that last a few Milliseconds.
 Particularly, it is alleged that a person can detect whether another person is lying through the correct interpretation of microexpressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, indicated how people who are incapable of understanding speech because of brain damage are, despite this, able to evaluate sincerity with precision.
 He even suggests that such abilities to interpret human behavior may be shared by animals like domestic dogs.
 Research of the twentieth century concluded that there are two ways of genetic variation: secret and manifest.
 Mutation adds a new genetic variation and selection removes it from the group of expressed variation.
 Segregation and recombination mix the variation between the two bases with each generation.
 In the savanna, it's difficult for a primate with a digestive system like humans, consuming the available vegetal resources, to satisfy its amino acid requirements.
 Besides, not acting can have grave consequences: severe depression, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 Because the dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed shaft, called a rachis, but do have other features of feathers—barbs and barbules—the researchers inferred the rachis was likely a later evolutionary development that these other features.
 However, foods of animal origin (ants, termites, eggs) not only are easily digested, but also provide proteins in great quantity that contain all the essential amino acids.
 Taking all this into account, it would not be surprising if our own ancestors solved their protein problems more or less as the savannah chimpanzees do today.
 Sleep interruption is a process that consists of waking up intentionally during the normal sleep period and then falling asleep again shortly afterward (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be easily done by using a half-quiet alarm clock to bring it to consciousness without awakening him.
 If you find yourself redefining the clock while you're asleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other possibilities based on the biorhythm include drinking plenty of liquid (especially water or tea, a known diuretic) before bed, forcing the person to wake up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace of a person correlates in an opposite way to their level of bodily and spiritual tension.
 The smaller the tension, the more positive is the vital force present. Every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everybody can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that gets in the way of that is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha, but has been expanded by the Mahayana path of love and many techniques of Indian Yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists in Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the Path of Compassionate love.
 With Kundalini yoga, the kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualizations.
 The central part of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, through visualization of various deities, the channels of energy are cleansed, the chakras are activated, and the consciousness of enlightenment is created.
 Germany was a common villain in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. With the end of the war, system shocks, processes and cultures led to the disintegration of the countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the ex-allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 The goal was to last for the next 40 years and, in fact, there would be replacement troops leadership in the battlefields from Africa to Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already destroyed and the only way out was to retreat and regroup along the Romanian bridgehead.
 Nevertheless, these plans became obsolete almost overnight when more than 800,000 soldiers of the Soviet Union's Red Army created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the Eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 The use of ships to transport goods is by far the most efficient way to move people and goods on a large scale across the oceans.
 The work of the Marines has traditionally been to assure that their country maintains the ability to displace population and goods while, at the same time, interfering with the ability of their enemies to displace their own people and goods.
 One of the most notable recent examples of this was the battle of the North Atlantic during World War II, when the Americans were trying to move men and materials across the Atlantic ocean to help Britain.
 At the same moment, the organization of the German Navy, using overtly U-boats, was trying to end that traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany probably would have the capacity to conquer Britain as it did with the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats had their domestication for the first time about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Cultures and tribes of old began to keep them in order to facilitate access to milk, fur, meat and skins.
 Domestic goats generally were kept in herds that wandered the hills or other grazing areas, often cared for by children or adolescents, similar to the more well-known shepherd.
 Wagonways were constructed in England from the 16th century onwards.
 Although the wagons consisted only of parallel wooden planks, this allowed the horses to pull them at greater speeds and carry greater loads on the somewhat rougher roads.
 Dormentes were implemented well at the beginning, to keep the rails in place. Gradually, however, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a metal cover on the top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Eventually, the wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first totally iron rails were introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking. Humans began walking upright two million years ago with the emergence of Homo Erectus, which means upright man.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright as usual.
 Adaptations of bipedalism are found in the Australopithecus fossils dating between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago,
 We can begin to live in a more friendly way with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even be activists to reduce future suffering in some degree.
 This is exactly how symptomatic treatment in many cases works. However, if we do not want to have only a temporary solution, we must find the origin of the problems and end them.
 It's obvious enough that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological advances of the human race, and problems have become greater because of the super population and extravagant lifestyle of man.
 After adoption by the Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent to a few blocks away, to a printing shop owned by John Dunlap.
 During the night, about 150 to 200 copies were made, now known as the Dunlap attacks.
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon, in the courtyard of the Salão da Independência on July 8.
 On July 6, one was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9, a copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap attacks that still exist are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original hand-made copy has not survived.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are alive today we call them birds.
 Many people do not think of them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many similarities between birds and dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on their two hind legs, like a T-rex.
 Almost all computers used today are based on manipulation of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, that is, 0 or 1, and these numbers are classified as Binary digits, or bits, using the language used in computing.
 The inner poisoning may not be apparent immediately, the symptoms, like vomiting, are so general that a diagnosis cannot be made immediately.
 The largest indication of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container with medication or household chemicals.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions related to that poison in particular.
 The term insects is used by entomologists in a formal sense to treat this group of insects.
 This term derives from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs, which are insects that are structured enough to stick to human beings.
 Both barbers and lice are nidicolous, adapted to live in nests or shelters of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the leading neurological disease in young and adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is composed of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women have two times more chances of having multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may decide that having a baby is not in their or their child's best interest.
 Such couples are allowed to decide on a plan for adopting the baby.
 In adoption, biological parents rescind their parental rights so that another couple can care for the child.
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which is the method that guides scientific research.
 It's not, in fact, only experimentation, an experiment is a test used to eliminate one of the possible hypotheses or more, to ask questions, to make observations also guide a scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers concentrated on classical texts and, in particular, the Bible in Latin.
 All of Aristotle's scientific thoughts were accepted, including psychology.
 As Greek knowledge receded, the West found itself distanced from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Various rhythms observed in physiology and in normal behaviour fundamentally depend on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not absolutely responses to periodic external stimuli, have been constated for the majority of living beings, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue to function for a period of continuous cycle, even without the interference of the environment.
 The experiment of Hershey and Chase was one of the principal indicators that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase use phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into the bacteria.
 They did two experiments that marked or the DNA of Phage with radioactive phosphorus or the Phage protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can present a variety of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the piece of genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germinative.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be transmitted to children, while mutations in other parts can cause cell death or cancer.
 Natural tourism attracts people interested in visiting areas of nature with the aim of enjoying the landscape, including fauna and flora.
 Examples of local activities include fishing, taking photographs, bird watching, visiting parks, and studying about the ecosystem.
 An example is visiting, photographing and learning about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, by car, people leave the small towns of the interior to go to work in other cities, and they encounter other people who work just in those small towns from which they left.
 In this dynamic transportation system, everyone is in some way connected and supporting a system based on private cars.
 The science today points out that this carbon-based economy has dislocated the biosphere from the stable state that had permitted human evolution over the last two million years.
 All participate in society and use the transport systems. Almost all also complain about these transport systems.
 In developed countries, rarely do you hear similar levels of complaints about the quality of water or falling bridges.
 Why do transport systems generate such complaints, why do they fail daily, are transport engineers simply incompetent, or is something more fundamental going on?
 Flow of traffic is the analysis of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two different points and the interactions they make with each other.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic flow is difficult because the driver's behavior cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a relatively consistent range, so traffic flows tend to have some reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, relationships were established between the three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 Such relations aid in the planning, design, and operations of viarious installations.
 Insects were the first animals to go airborne, their ability to fly helping them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a greater range of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings back are dragonflies and ephemera.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system moved around the sun.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the sun, moved around the earth.
 This sounds sensible, because planet earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the largest river and the second longest on earth, carrying more than eight times the water of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes with nearly 10 km wide.
 A total of 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet to the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main River Amazon possesses 6,387 km (3,980 miles). It receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Despite the fact that the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Ancient Empire, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and in technical excellence of construction.
 The ancients of the New Empire marveled at the constructions of their predecessors, which had up to then more than a thousand years.
 The Vatican City has about 800 people, and is the smallest independent country in the world, with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its laws and official communications.
 Italian is also the common language used by most who work in the state, while Latin is frequently used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican city are Roman Catholics.
 Since ancient times, people have known basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper because all can be discovered in nature in the natural form and are relatively simple to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that everything is a mixture of one or more of four elements, which are earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was more related to the four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas, and plasma, although he also theorized that they transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are simply a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Initially, he was hospitalised at the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 You can also get wires that include small amounts of non-metal elements, like carbon.
 All things in the universe are made of matter, all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so amazingly tiny that it would be possible to fit trillions of them in the point at the end of this sentence.
 The pencil was a good friend to many people when it was launched.
 Unfortunately, as new methods of writing appeared, the pencil was relegated to a lesser and lesser important role.
 At the present time, people write messages by means of computer screens and do not need to get close to a pointer.
 We can only imagine what the keyboard will become when something newer comes along.
 The fission bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to build a nucleus with several protons and neutrons.
 It's more or less like walking up a hill with a heavy cart, and the division of the nucleus again liberates some of that energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they tend to separate with little or no incentive.
 The surface of the moon is made of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The crust possesses 70 km of thickness on the visible side and 100 km of thickness on the invisible side.
 The layer is thinner under the seas and thicker under the mountains.
 There may be more Maria on the nearest side because the crust is thinner, it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what motivates people or what attracts them.
 These theories suggest that people possess certain needs and or desires that have been internalized as they have reached adulthood.
 These theories analyze what is in certain people that makes them want to do what they do and what things in their environment will cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories of content are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor theory.
 In general, two conducts may surface as managers begin to lead their former co-workers. One side of the spectrum tries to remain as part of the group of guys.
 This type of manager has difficulty in taking unpopular decisions, adopting disciplinary measures, making performance evaluations, delegating and holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the person becomes an individual impossible to recognize who feels that they must change everything the team has done and do their own.
 Finally, the leader is responsible for the success and failure of a team.
 This behavior several times ends up in conflicts between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams must maintain the same standards of excellence as teams considered conventional, however, there are some subtle differences.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star with respect to magnetic reversals.
 They frequently have more autonomy than conventional team members, as their teams may find themselves in various time zones, which may not be comprehended by local management.
 The presence of a true “invisible team” (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p.109) is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team for whom each member should report. The invisible team defines the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization want to go through the difficult process of establishing a learning organization? One of the practical goals of the concepts of organizational learning is innovation.
 When all the resources available are effectively used by all the functional departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity transpire.
 As a result, the process of a team working to overcome a difficulty may lead to a new innovative process that meets the client's need.
 Before even an innovative organization, leaders need to create a culture of innovation, as well as a shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) clarifies the Continuum approach as a methodology used to help organizations achieve higher levels in their performances.
 Neurobiological data offer physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition, therefore, narrowing the area of research and making it much more exact.
 The correlation between brain and behavioral pathology underpins scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, lesions and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The emergence of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes never before seen.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to design simulation models that help us to understand the processes that exist in our mind.
 Despite IA having a strong connotation of science fiction, IA is a very important branch of computer science, addressing behavior, learning, and adaptive intelligence in a machine.
 Research in AI involves the production of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent activity.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to attend to client issues and diagnoses, as well as recognition of writing, voice and speech.
 These things became separate disciplines, which concentrate on providing solutions for real-life problems.
 The IA system is frequently used in the areas of economics, medicine, engineering, and military, as it is integrated in various software applications of home computers and Video games.
 Visits of study are very important for any school class. Often, teachers would love to take their students to places where a bus trip is not an option.
 Technology offers the solution with virtual field trips. From the classroom, students can view pieces from museums, visit an Aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 Each year, students at Bennet school in North Carolina develop a Website about their trip to the state capital.
 Blogs can also help in improving the writing of students, since students, frequently, initiate their contact with Blogs using poor grammar and spelling, then the presence of a general public usually changes that.
 As students frequently are the most critical audience, the author of the Blog begins to strive to improve writing and avoid criticism.
 Besides, having a Blog, forces the students to become more knowledgeable of the world around them.
 Writing in Blogs is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend learning well beyond the traditional day of school.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can make students more Analytical and Critical, by interacting with Internet content in an active way, students can position themselves in the context of other's writings as well as define their own perspectives on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the charming, bilingual capital of Canada and boasts a number of art galleries and museums that demonstrate the Canadian past and present.
 Niagara falls are to the south, and the northern part of Ontario has the untouched natural beauty of Muskoka.
 Due to all this and much more, Ontario stands out as what people from outside consider to be the essence of Canada.
 Grand areas more to the North are also quite sparsely populated, and some are practically uninhabited.
 For a population comparison that surprises many people, there are more African-Americans living in the U S. than Canadian citizens.
 The Islands of East Africa are in the Indian Ocean, a distance from the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is, by far, the largest, and a continent by itself, when it comes to wildlife.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations, or associated with France, and are known as luxurious Beach hotels.
 Arabs also brought Islam to the lands, which gained much popularity in Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama found the route from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is limited by the Sahel, and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: it is recommended that all travelers say they are married, regardless of their current marital status.
 It's useful also to use a ring (but not one that looks too expensive).
 Women should understand that cultural differences can cause acts that they would consider as harassment, and it is not uncommon to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men. Do not be afraid to stand firm (whether for cultural differences or not, this does not mean that everything is okay <Exclamationpoint>
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed and rebuilt it with the name Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, which received the name of Casablanca from the Spanish traders who established commercial bases there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop in Morocco as a whole.
 Near the historic part of Medina is easy to find traditional Moroccan goods, like tagines, ceramics, leather goods, narguilés and more a monte of bugigangas, all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of Congo, in the extreme East, near Rwanda.
 In the year of 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of Nyiragongo, which buried a large part of the city, mainly the center.
 Goma, though reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma must be studied to understand the state of the battle that persists in the province of Nord-Kivu.
 The city is also a base for climbing Nyiragongo, along with some of the cheapest gorilla treks in Africa.
 You can use a boda-boda (motorbike taxi) to tour Goma. The normal price (local) is about 500 Congolese francs for a quick tour.
 Timbuktu came to be used as a metaphor for distant and exotic lands, given its relative inaccessibility.
 Today, Timbuktu is a impoverished city despite its reputation for making it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In the year 1990, it was placed on the list of humanity's heritage in danger, due to the danger of the desert's sands.
 It was one of the main stops during the Wonders of the African World program of Henry Louis Gates, broadcast on the PBS channel.
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country because it has a more Arab than African touch.
 Kruger National Park is in the northeast of South Africa, along the border of Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north, and the Crocodile River on the Southern border.
 The park covers 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different ecological zones, each sustaining different animal species.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the flagship of South Africa's National Parks (SANParks).
 There are fees for entry and conservation of the park, just as happens with all national parks in South Africa.
 It can be very useful to also acquire a Wild Card. With it you can have access to various parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 Hong Kong Island gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and is the location that many tourists consider to be its principal attraction.
 The parade of buildings that form Hong Kong's skyline has been compared to a cintillating graph that is visible through the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To have the best views of Hong Kong, leave the island and go to the Kowloon waterfront on the opposite side.
 Most of Hong Kong's urban development is densely concentrated in reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is the place British colonizers chose to live, so if you're looking for evidence of the territory's colonial past, this is a great place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest Mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 km inland from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans was declared a UNESCO World Heritage site. The part of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 But the forests are not just home to mangrove swamps they have some of the last great forests that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², with one third of it being covered by water.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans are a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 deer in the area.
 There are several bus times from the inter-district bus station (on the other side of the river) during the day, but most, especially those going east and Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As inter-district buses are almost always crowded, it is advisable to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 The majority of districts are served by Japanese coastal Microbuses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Shared taxis are a fast and comfortable way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oiapoque River bridge is a stained-glass bridge. It crosses the Oiapoque River to link the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint Georges de l'Oiapoque, French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 meters, are 378 meters long and have two runways of 3.50 m in width.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 201 and did not open to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to enter operation in September 2017, the date scheduled for the finalization of customs inspections in Brazil.
 The Guarani were the most significant indigenous group that inhabited what is today the East of Paraguay, living as Seminomadic hunters who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The region of Chaco was home to other indigenous groups, such as the Guaicurus and the Paiaguás, who lived off of hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, previously called the giant province of the Indies, emerged from the encounter of Spanish conquerors with indigenous groups.
 The Spanish initiated the period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the creation of Assunción in 1537, Paraguay has succeeded in maintaining many of its characteristics and identity of the indigenous populations.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Tournaments and minor parties can also be seen here at other times of the year.
 To find out about tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches, consult the Argentina Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falklands is the Falkland Islands pound, FKP, which is equivalent to one British pound.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the Islands, which is located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound sterling is generally accepted anywhere in the Islands, and Stanley accepts American dollars and credit cards.
 In remote Islands, it is unlikely that credit cards will be accepted, although British and American coins may be received. Please inform yourself with the owners in advance to know which method of payment they accept.
 It's practically impossible to change the currency of the Falklands outside the Islands, so change your money before you leave the Islands.
 As Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there while it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is in the subtropical region, and in the summer months, temperatures above 30 °C are common.
 Winter can be disappointingly cold: temperatures rarely fall below freezing, but the wind and humidity combined make the sensation feel colder than the thermometer shows.
 There are no particular seasons of particularly wet or dry weather.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to the presence of humans, they are still wild animals that should not be fed or disturbed.
 Following instructions from park authorities, keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves, and 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 Despite their docile appearance, bisons, moose and bears, like all large animals, can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they didn't maintain an adequate distance. These animals are big, wild and potentially dangerous, so don't get too close.
 Besides, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, however, avoid carrying or cooking foods with strong odor and keep the camping site clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the scene of a known naval impasse in 1889 when seven ships of Germany, the USA and Britain refused to leave it.
 All ships were sunk, except for one cruiser from Britain. Nearly 200 lives of Germans and Americans perished.
 During the Mau movement's organized struggle for independence, a peaceful rally in the city resulted in the assassination of the Supreme Chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are many beaches, due to Auckland being between two Enseadas. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of the North Coast (in the North Harbour district) are washed by the Pacific Ocean and range from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 They are almost all sandy beaches with safe swimming, and many have shade from the Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located in Waitemata Harbour, in the sophisticated suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, in the central region of Auckland.
 These are sometimes family-friendly beaches packed with a wide variety of shops along the coast. Swimming is safe.
 The principal local beer is the Number One, which is not elaborated, but is pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called Manta.
 There are many French wines to appreciate, but New Zealand and Australian wines may descend better.
 The local tap water is totally safe to drink, but it's easy to find bottled water if you're worried.
 For Australians, the concept of a flat white is strange, a short black is an espresso, a cappuccino comes full of cream, not foam, and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is in accordance with Belgian standards. The natural juices are expensive, but great.
 Many trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from any of these causes, occurring in the reef, are rare.
 Continue obeying the authorities, obeying all the signs, and paying very close attention to the safety alerts.
 The Cubomedusa occurs near beaches and estuaries of rivers, from October to April, north of 1770. They can occasionally be found in other periods.
 Sharks really do exist, but rarely attack humans, most are afraid of humans and tend to swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live actively in the ocean, their main habitat is the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 To reserve in advance gives the traveler the tranquility of knowing that he will have a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agents used to do business with specific hotels, although it's probably possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping parks, through a travel agent.
 Travel agents generally offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even combined packages with flights and hotels.
 They can also guarantee your reservation if you need time to think about the offer or gather other documents for your destination.
 However, if there is any alteration or request, this must first be sent to the travel agent, and not directly to the hotel.
 At some festivals, the vast majority of music festival attendees decide to camp on site, and the majority of them consider this a fundamental part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll have to get there early to camp near the music.
 Remember that even after the music ends on the main stages, some sections of the festival may continue playing late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic in the winter, check the location of the cabin, as crossing the ice generates a terrible noise for the most sensitive.
 Cruises to St Petersburg include tours of the city. Passengers are exempt from visa requirements (see terms).
 Casinos normally make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by their visitors. In general, there are no windows or clocks, and exits can be difficult to find.
 They generally have special food, beverage and entertainment offers to keep guests in good humor and to keep them on the premises.
 Some locations offer alcoholic beverages for house, however, drunkenness prejudices judgment, and all good bettors know the importance of maintaining sobriety.
 Always when someone drives in places with high latitudes or on roads over the mountains, he must take into consideration the possibility of facing snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 In roads with ice and snow, friction is low, and you cannot drive as if you were on a clean asphalt.
 During the snowstorms, it's possible to get enough snow to leave you stranded in very little time.
 Visibility may also be reduced due to snow falling or blowing, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 But regardless of his discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 Safaris are probably the largest tourist attraction in Africa and a major draw for many visitors.
 The term safari, in its colloquial use, refers to land travel to observe the impressive African wildlife, mainly in the savanna.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, have a tendency to approach cars, and basic equipment allows for good viewing.
 Lions, leopards and cheetahs are sometimes shy, and you'll see them best with binoculars.
 Also known as a walk in the woods, a safari walk, or a passada, a safari walk is equivalent to walking, whether for a few hours or many days.
 The Paralympics will occur between August 24 and September 5, 2021, with some events being held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only city in Asia to have hosted two summer Olympics, having been the host of the games in 1964.
 If you scheduled your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may have a complicated situation.
 As of the end of March, most cancellation policies because of the Coronavirus did not extend through July of 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled.
 It's expected that most tickets for the events will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with normal tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 Passing wet clothes can help dry them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for loan, even if there isn't one in the room.
 If an iron is not available, or if you do not like using passed meals, you can try using a hair dryer if it is available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric get too hot, which can cause it to shrink or, in more severe cases, cause burns.
 There are different ways to purify water, some more efficient against specific threats.
 In some areas, boiling water for one minute is sufficient, in others, many minutes are necessary.
 The quality of filters vary and if you're in doubt, it's probably best to consider buying gallons of water from a trusted company.
 Travelers may encounter animals with which they are unfamiliar in the regions from which they came.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, at worst, cause allergic reactions, spread poison or transmit infections.
 Infections, or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill people through force, generally do not qualify as pests.
 Duty free shopping is a chance to buy goods free of taxes and duties in certain locations.
 Travelers who visit countries with high taxes sometimes can save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont presents the most challenging conditions for drivers on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, which frequently pass through isolated areas.
 If you're not used to driving in the interior, use your judgment: steep grades, narrow roads, and sharp curves are common.
 The announced speed limits are visibly lower than in the previous and subsequent sections -- commonly 55-65 km/h -- and strict obedience to them is even more important than the contrary.
 Curiously, though, cell phone service is much stronger here than along many other stretches of the route, like, for example, in Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are very good and, in Bavaria, are well capricious and varied, like those of the neighboring South, Austria.
 Fruits are recurrent, with apples baked in cakes all year long, and cherries and plums marking presence during the summer.
 Many German bakeries also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. The famous cakes go very well with a cup of coffee.
 If you want some small, but tasty, desserts, try what, depending on the region, may be called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 A curry is a dish based on herbs and spices, together with meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either dry or wet depending on the amount of liquid.
 In regions of the North of India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, in the South of India and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a wide range that encompasses a great variety of regional cooking found throughout the country.
 But, if used without other qualifiers, the term tends to mean that the food originally is from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine includes a variety of simply spiced dishes, the predominant condiments of Javanese preference being peanuts, chilies, sugar (principally Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 For a rider's feet to have support, stirrups are used, which hang from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide greater stability for the rider, but can present safety problems, as the rider's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a knight is thrown from a horse, but had one of his feet gripped in the stirrup, he can be dragged if the animal ends up fleeing.
 First, a large part of pilots use riding boots with a high heel and a flat sole, which is quite narrow.
 Some seals, particularly English seals, have safety bars that allow a leather strap to fall from the saddle if pulled back by a rider in a fall.
 Being Chile's principal climbing destination, the Cochamó Valley is known as Yosemite of South America, with a variety of great granite walls and cliffs.
 The meetings include points of view from the peaks. Alpinists from all parts of the world are continuously establishing new routes among their infinite potential of walls.
 Sports played in snow, which include skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding over terrain covered with snow with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is an important activity on the trip for many enthusiasts, occasionally known as ski bums, who plan entire vacations just to ski in a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old—paintings on rock that depict skiers date back to 5,000 BC.
 Alpine skiing as a sport dates back to at least the 17th century, and in the year 1861, the first recreational ski team was opened by citizens of Norway in Australia.
 Backpack skiing: activity also known as Sertão skiing, skiing of the sertão, or skiing-alpinism.
 It's related, but generally not involves tourism for Alpine skiing or mountaineering, the latter feats in terrain that's very steep and requiring much stiffer boots and skis.
 Think of the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you'll be able to cover distances a little bit longer than on foot but only very rarely will you be able to achieve cross-country skiing speeds without a heavy pack on prepared tracks.
 Europe is a relatively small continent but with many independent countries. In normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to pass through visa and passport control several times.
 Schengen, however, functions as a country in this respect.
 If you stay in this area, it is possible to cross the border without passing through passport control posts again.
 Da same way, possuindo a Schengen visa, you will not need to apply for visas for each of the Schengen space member countries separately, saving time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition that specifies which manufactured items are antiques. Some agencies define that items over 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition possesses geographic variations, where the limit age may be lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade products can be defined as antiques, although they are younger than similar mass-produced products.
 Reindeer herding is an important means of subsistence among the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is important also for many other classes of professionals.
 Though it's a tradition, not all Sami participated in the creation of reindeer in large scale, but lived off fishing, hunting, and things of that sort, having reindeer as mainly, mainly, animals of traction.
 Today, many Sámi work with modern businesses. Tourism is an important income in Sápmi, the Sámi area.
 Although widely used, especially among non-Romany, the term Gypsy is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions about the Romani people.
 If the country you're visiting is subject to travel orientations, your travel health insurance or your travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 It is also recommended that you consult other governments Besides your own, but their advice is for their respective citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may pass through situations different from those faced by Europeans or Arabs.
 Councils are only a brief resume of the political situation in a nation.
 The views presented are normally superficial, general and simplified in relation to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Weather is the generic term for any climatic phenomenon that has the potential to cause damage, serious social disruptions, or loss of human life.
 Weather can occur in any part of the world and encompasses different types, which vary according to geographic location, topography and weather conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a rigorous climate, such as storms, tornadoes, water spouts and cyclones.
 Severe regional and seasonal weather phenomena include snow, ice, and dust storms.
 Travelers are strongly advised to stay attentive to any risk of bad weather in their region, as this can affect travel plans.
 When planning a visit to a country that is considered a war zone, first the person should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for 'Hostile environment' will normally indicate the address of a company in the region.
 A course will normally cover all the topics conversed here with much more detail, normally with practical experience.
 A course generally lasts between 2 and 5 days and involves drama, several first aid and, sometimes, training with weapons.
 Books and magazines that treat of survival in the jungle are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning a sex change surgery abroad should ensure that they are carrying valid documents for the return trip.
 The disposition of governments to issue passports with gender undefined, X, or documents updated to find a name and a gender desired, varies.
 The disposition of foreign governments to honor these documents is widely variable.
 The searches at security checkpoints also became much more intrusive after September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people who have not yet had the surgery to change their gender should not expect to pass through the scanners with their privacy and dignity intact.
 Corrents of return are the reflux of the water of the waves on the beach, generally in a reef or similar area.
 Due to the subaquatic topography, the return flow concentrates in some deeper sections, and a rapid current can form there.
 Most of the deaths are a result of fatigue from trying to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, swimming back is no more difficult than it would usually be.
 Try to aim from somewhere where you can't be caught or, depending on your skills or if you've been detected, wait for rescue.
 The re-entry shock occurs before the culture shock (it occurs less time of honeymoon), it lasts more time and it can be more serious.
 Travelers who adapt easily to the new culture sometimes have a special difficulty in readjusting to their native culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you adapt to the new culture and lose some of the habits of your local culture.
 When you went abroad for the first time, people probably were patient and compassionate, knowing that travelers in a new country need to adapt.
 People do not imagine that patience and understanding are also fundamental for travelers who are returning home.
 In the area reserved for children, one of the most interesting things is the show of lights and sounds of the pyramid.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and also in silence before the show begins.
 Normally you always hear the sound of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx is defined as the backdrop and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are displayed in the pyramids and different pyramids are illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, which were discovered in the year 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the largest number of bases, with sixteen active as of the year 2020.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 The other two are Livingston Island and Deception, in which the caldera of a still active volcano provides a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth land is the Southern region of the peninsula, coasting the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountains of the Peninsula here melt into the plain, then re-emerge to form the 360-kilometer chain of Ellsworth mountains, cut by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel Range, has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, reaching 4,892 m on Mount Vinson.
 In remote locations, without cellular coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, since to make a call you need to be outdoors with a view to the satellite.
 The service is frequently used for transportation, including recreational vessels, as well as expeditions that have remote data and voice needs.
 Your local telephone operator may offer more information about connecting to this service.
 One option that's becoming more and more popular for those who want to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 This is especially popular among those leaving school, allowing them to take a year off before university, without compromising their education.
 In most cases, if you enroll in a course abroad during a year sabbatical, you can, in fact, increase your chances of entering higher education in your home country.
 Normally, there will be a registration fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 For those who like boat trips, Finland is a great destination. In the lakes and coastal archipelagos, the “Land of a thousand lakes” also has thousands of islands.
 In archipelagos and lakes, you do not necessarily need a yacht.
 Despite the fact that the archipelagos coastal and the largest lakes are really large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even canoes offer a different experience.
 Sailing with a boat is a national pastime in Finland, with a boat for every seven or eight people.
 This is combined by Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but a form quite characteristic (for example, in the Netherlands, the number is one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises offer extended stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can visit the historic city for two entire days and return to the ship for the night.
 If you only embark on sea excursions, you do not need a separate visa (valid from 2009).
 Some cruises show Berlin, Germany, on the brochures. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Traveling by airplane can be a scary experience for people of all ages and origins, especially if those people have never flown before or have never been through a traumatic event.
 It's not something to be ashamed of, it's not different from personal fears and antipathies for other things that many people have.
 For some, understanding something about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome the fear that is based on the unknown or not being in control.
 Transport companies are well paid to deliver things quickly. Often, time is very important in shipping documents, goods or spare parts for an urgent repair.
 In some routes, the bigger companies have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, there was a problem.
 If they sent things by air freight, depending on the route, it could take days to get to the airport and pass through customs.
 The only way to go faster was to send it as baggage, and airline regulations do not allow baggage to be sent without a passenger, which is where you come in.
 The obvious way to fly first class or in the executive class is by disbursing a large amount of money for the privilege, or, better yet, by having your company do it for you.
 However, it's not cheap: as a basic rule, you can expect to pay up to four times more for the economy fare,
 In general, it's not worth even searching for discounts on seats for first or business class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that there is a small group of passengers who are willing to pay a high price for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably, and charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The language of the country is Romanian, but Russian is widely used.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has suffered from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria Republic in the east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member country.
 Economic relations were reestablished between these two parts of Moldavia, despite the failure in political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million people, and has the second largest port after Istanbul, in addition to an excellent transportation center.
 Once the ancient city of Esmirna, now a modern, developed, and bustling commercial center located around a large bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The wide avenues, the glass-fronted buildings and the modern shopping centers are marked by traditional red roofs, the market of the 18th century, and the old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere that reminds more of Mediterranean Europe than of classical Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, there are interesting marble sculptures of pigeons on tombs of people.
 It's worth a half-hour walk through the intriguing village.
 To the north, and easily accessible, is the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became famous among foreigners after an exuberant report of its splendor made by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb 403 bus travels to Sintra frequently, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 Also to the north, visit the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima, a place famous throughout the world for Marian apparitions.
 Recall that you are basically making a visit to a huge cemetery, also as a place that has a meaning practically incalculable for a significant portion of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their period here and many others, both Jewish and non-Jewish, whose loved ones were murdered or worked to death.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not damage the place by staining or cracking the constructions with graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Almost half of the people prefer to speak Catalan, most of them understand it, and almost all know Spanish.
 Most of the signs are in Catalan, however, because this is the language that was established by law as the official language.
 Still, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other installations.
 The regular announcements on the Metro are made only in Catalan, but unplanned interruptions are announced by a system automated in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians have the reputation of being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just an inadequate stereotype, the best way to get along in Paris is still to act like someone who is bien élevé, or well-educated.
 The rough exterior of the Parisian will quickly disappear, if you show some basic courtesies.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is highly forested, mainly with beeches, firs, and pines, and presents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 There is a notable diversity of plant communities, due to the varied microclimates, different soils and different levels of altitude.
 The area also abounds in a great variety of animal and bird species.
 Rare animals can be found there, such as European Brown Bears, wolves, Eagles, Owls, Lynx, Wildcats and Tetrazes, as well as several other common species.
 While visiting the monasteries, women are required to wear skirts covering their knees and also have their shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries provide robes for women who arrive unprepared, but if you bring your own robes, especially with bright colors, you will be received with a smile from the monk or the nun.
 Similarly, men are required to wear pants that cover the knees.
 It is possible to borrow clothes at the entrance, however, they are not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar zones in the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in everything.
 A simple and popular dish, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato and any ingredient at hand, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, along with the word Sie for you, always start with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 This also makes reading easier, no doubt, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the need to discover whether a verb or adjective is used in a substantivated form.
 Pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, since most words are pronounced exactly as they were written.
 The main letters to be observed are C and G, since their pronunciation varies according to the vowel that follows.
 Besides, make sure to pronounce r and rr differently: caro means dear, while carro means automobile.
 Persian is a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and understand the phrases better.
 Nor is it necessary to say that if you have knowledge of a Romance language, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who speak a little Spanish may conclude hastily that Portuguese is similar enough to the point of not needing to study separately.
 Pre-Modern Observatories are mostly obsolete today and remain in museums or schools.
 As the light pollution in their golden age was not a problem, they tend to be found in cities or University campuses, easier to reach than the more recently built ones.
 Most modern research telescopes are enormous installations in remote areas that present favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The observation of cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the flowers of the peach tree were the preferred flower.
 In Japan, the first Cherry Blossom festivals were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy around the Imperial court.
 Plants look better when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even just one.
 If you visit a Formal-Arranged garden, collecting specimens will also get you kicked out, without right to discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place and very easy to explore, and you can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 But being in the high tropics, just a few degrees north of the equator, you'll need to deal with both the heat and the strong sun when the sky is clear, more rarely.
 There are also some buses going to the north to Hebrom, the traditional cemetery of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and their wives.
 Check if the bus you intend to take goes to Hebron, and not just to the nearby town of Kiryat Arba.
 Rivers in the interior can be a good theme around which to organize a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or take a boat tour to the points of interest on the Danube or navigate the Erie Canal.
 They also define routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity and is celebrated as the anniversary of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions of the holiday have been adopted also by non-believers in Christian and Non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night awake in some open place to see the rising of the sun.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 The most traditional churches hold a Paschal vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and congregations often break the celebration at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that originally arrived on the Islands came here by swimming, flying or boating.
 Due to the long distance from the mainland, mammals could not make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main animal of the Galapagos.
 Since the arrival of humans in Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic areas in winter, you will experience polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a great opportunity to see the Aurora Borealis, as the sky gets darker more or less at the right time.
 As the areas are sparsely populated, and consequently, light pollution is not a problem, you'll also be able to appreciate the stars.
 In Japan, cultural workplace relationships are more based on hierarchy and formality than Westerners are used to seeing.
 The suits are the traje-padrão in business, and co-workers call each other by their sobrenomes or cargos.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, emphasizing the group effort instead of enhancing individual achievements.
 Workers generally need the approval of their superiors for all decisions they make, and expect to obey instructions from their superiors without questioning them.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.4272284584682033, 'precisions': [0.7118481134342706, 0.49094097019286964, 0.3590794176619301, 0.26548107615139077], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0099106023219127, 'translation_length': 24966, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 67.53438316432234, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}